Vermont, session 2025-2026, H725.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1505 is amended to read:
§ 1505. APPLICATION
(a) This chapter shall not apply to any employer or any labor dispute that
affects commerce within the meaning of the National Labor Relations Act, 29
U.S.C. §§ 151–169, unless the National Labor Relations Board shall have
ceded jurisdiction to the Board pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 160 or, shall have
declined to assert jurisdiction pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 164(c), or can no longer
execute its statutory duties for any reason, including:
VT LEG #383751 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.725
2026 Page 2 of 2
(1) the repeal of the National Labor Relations Act or a narrowing of the
National Labor Relations Act so that it no longer covers a certain type, class,
or industry of workers; or
(2) the preemptive effect of the National Labor Relations Act is no
longer effective.
(b) If the Board acquires jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) or
(a)(2) of this section, the Board shall, upon petition, promptly certify the
exclusive bargaining representative of any bargaining unit previously certified
by the National Labor Relations Board and whose certification remained in
effect until federal preemption was no longer effective. The Board shall verify
the validity of the certification formerly granted by the National Labor
Relations Board within 60 days after receipt of the petition. All existing terms
and conditions of employment between an exclusive bargaining representative,
previously certified by the National Labor Relations Board, and an employer
shall remain in full force and effect during the Board’s verification process.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #383751 v.1